fst/chv.twol
Alphabet
  а ӑ е ё ӗ и о у ӳ ы э ю я б в г д ж з к л м н п р с ҫ т ф х ц ч ш щ й ь ъ
  А Ă Е Ё Ӗ И О У Ӳ Ы Э Ю Я Б В Г Д Ж З К Л М Н П Р С Ҫ Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Й Ь Ъ 
 %{A%}:а %{A%}:е %{Ă%}:ӑ %{Ă%}:ӗ %{Ă%}:0 %{М%}:м %{М%}:0
;

Sets 

BackVow = ӑ а ы о у я ё ю ;

FrontVow = ӗ э и ӳ е ; 

Cns = б в г д ж з к л м н п р с ҫ т ф х ц ч ш щ й ь ъ ; 


Rules 

"Back vowel harmony for archiphoneme {A}"
%{A%}:а <=> BackVow: [ Cns: | %>: ]+ _ ; 

"If surface vowel before morpheme boundary"
%{Ă%}:0 <=> [:BackVow | :FrontVow] %>: _ ;

"If previous %{М%}:0"
%{Ă%}:0 <=> %{М%}:0 %>: _ ;

! хула>се{М}>{Ă}н  

"if there is a following %{Ă%}: followed by н"
%{М%}:0 <=> _ %>: %{Ă%}: н: ;
!the following archiphoneme comes after the morpheme boundary

"%{Ă%}:ӑ according to vowel harmony if previous consonant"
%{Ă%}:ӑ <=> BackVow: [ Cns: ]* %>: [ Cns: ]* _ ;

!патша>л{Ă}х

"%{Ă%}:ӗ according to vowel harmony"
%{Ă%}:ӗ <=> FrontVow: [ Cns: ]* %>: [ Cns: ]* _ ;  

"Remove morpheme boundary"
%>:0 <=> _ ;
